Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6389.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "Michigan major digital infrastructure act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Classification determination" means a determination by a local unit of government under section 5 as to whether a proposed data center is any of the classifications listed in section 5(4). (b) "Common control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management, operations, development, financing, construction, ownership, leasing, or use of a facility, parcel, project, phase, affiliate, subsidiary, contractor-controlled site, special purpose entity, or related development, whether through ownership, contract, lease, management agreement, development agreement, option agreement, power purchase arrangement, interconnection request, financing arrangement, or other means. (c) "Contiguous or commonly controlled sites" means parcels, buildings, facilities, phases, developments, or planned developments that are adjacent, nearby, functionally integrated, under common control, served by substantially shared infrastructure, part of a common development plan, or reasonably anticipated to operate as part of a single digital infrastructure development, regardless of whether the parcels or facilities are separated by a road, easement, utility corridor, right-of-way, parcel boundary, political boundary, ownership entity, lease, or phase line. (d) "Data center" means a facility, campus, group of buildings, or commonly controlled development located at a single site or at contiguous or commonly controlled sites that is primarily used to house, operate, or support servers, data storage systems, networking equipment, cooling systems, power infrastructure, or other information technology equipment for the purpose of processing, storing, managing, or transmitting digital data, including, but not limited to, cloud computing, artificial intelligence computing, high-performance computing, cryptocurrency mining, or collocation services. Data center does not include any of the following: (i) A facility owned or operated by a hospital, school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, nonpublic school, or institution of higher education solely for its internal operations. As used in this subparagraph, "school district", "intermediate school district", "public school academy", and "nonpublic school" mean those terms as defined in sections 4 to 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.4 to 380.6. (ii) A governmental facility used exclusively for public administration, emergency communications, public safety, or governmental continuity of operations. (iii) Telecommunications infrastructure that is regulated under federal law and primarily used for telecommunications transmission. (iv) A facility in which digital data processing is incidental to manufacturing, research and development, retail, office, logistics, health care, public safety, or educational activities conducted at the facility. (e) "Hyperscale data center" means a data center that meets 1 or more of the following: (i) Has, is designed to have, is approved for, or is reasonably projected to have an aggregate critical information technology load of 50 megawatts or more within 60 months after initial approval, including redundancy and back-up capacity. (ii) Occupies, is designed to occupy, or is reasonably projected to occupy 250,000 square feet or more of building space dedicated to data center operations. (iii) Occupies, controls, or is reasonably projected to occupy or control 100 acres or more of contiguous or commonly controlled sites. (iv) Requires, is represented as requiring, or is reasonably projected to require new or materially expanded off-site electric, transmission, distribution, water, wastewater, transportation, or emergency response infrastructure. (v) Is constructed or developed in phases that collectively meet or are reasonably anticipated to meet a threshold described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv). (f) "Local approval" means an approval, issuance, grant, or conditional approval by a local unit of government related to a site plan, permit, land use or activity, variance, easement, certificate, or other authorization for a proposed data center, including, but not limited to, under the Michigan zoning enabling act, 2006 PA 110, MCL 125.3101 to 125.3702. (g) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village. (h) "Major digital infrastructure development" means a hyperscale data center that a local unit of government determines is reasonably likely to require major review because of the combined scale of the hyperscale data center's electric load, land area, building footprint, phased development plans, common control arrangements, or infrastructure requirements. (i) "Major digital infrastructure development of statewide significance" means a major digital infrastructure development that a local unit of government determines is reasonably likely to involve 1 or more of the following: (i) A material impact on infrastructure that serves more than 1 local unit of government. (ii) A material impact on regional electric, transmission, distribution, water, wastewater, transportation, emergency response, or public service infrastructure. (iii) A physical development footprint, phased development plan, common control arrangement, or infrastructure requirement that requires the local approval of more than 1 local unit of government. (j) "Mega-hyperscale data center" means a hyperscale data center that meets 1 or more of the following requirements: (i) Has, is designed to have, is approved for, or is reasonably projected to have an aggregate critical information technology load of 100 megawatts or more within 36 months after initial approval, including redundancy and back-up capacity. (ii) Has, is designed to have, is approved for, or is reasonably projected to have an aggregate critical information technology load of 150 megawatts or more within 60 months after initial approval, including redundancy and back-up capacity. (iii) Occupies, is designed to occupy, or is reasonably projected to occupy 500,000 square feet or more of building space dedicated to data center operations. (iv) Occupies, controls, or is reasonably projected to occupy or control 250 acres or more of contiguous or commonly controlled sites. (v) Requires, is represented as requiring, or is reasonably projected to require electric infrastructure improvements. (vi) Is constructed, proposed, designed, approved, or developed in phases that collectively meet, are designed to meet, or are reasonably anticipated to meet a threshold described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v). (k) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (l) "Proposed data center" means a proposal to construct a new data center or to materially expand or modify an existing data center. Sec. 5. (1) A local unit of government shall not grant a local approval for a proposed data center unless the local unit of government has made a classification determination for the proposed data center in accordance with this section. (2) In order to obtain a classification determination under this section, a person must submit an application for a classification determination and the review fee required under subsection (3) to the local unit of government in which the proposed data center is to be located. The application must be on a form and in a manner prescribed by the local unit of government and must include all of the following information to the extent known or reasonably projected for the proposed data center: (a) The projected aggregate critical information technology load of the proposed data center. (b) The projected building square footage of the proposed data center dedicated to data center operations. (c) The acreage of the proposed data center and any contiguous or commonly controlled sites. (d) Whether the proposed data center is proposed, designed, approved, financed, or developed in phases. (e) Whether the proposed data center is under common control with any adjacent, nearby, functionally integrated, or infrastructure-related facility or development. (f) Whether the proposed data center requires, is represented as requiring, or is reasonably projected to require new or materially expanded off-site electric, transmission, distribution, water, wastewater, transportation, emergency response, or other public or utility infrastructure. (g) Any other information that the local unit of government determines is necessary for the classification determination. (3) An application submitted under subsection (2) must be accompanied by a review fee to the local unit of government in an amount determined by the local unit of government under this subsection. The amount of the review fee must not exceed the reasonably anticipated costs of the local unit of government to review applications received under this section. (4) Not later than 45 days after receiving an administratively complete application under subsection (2) and the review fee required under subsection (3), the local unit of government shall make a written determination as to whether the proposed data center is classified as 1 or more of the following: (a) A hyperscale data center. (b) A mega-hyperscale data center. (c) A major digital infrastructure development. (d) A major digital infrastructure development of statewide significance. Sec. 7. If a local unit of government classifies a proposed data center as a mega-hyperscale data center, major digital infrastructure development, or major digital infrastructure development of statewide significance under section 5, the local unit of government shall not grant a local approval for the proposed data center unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The local unit of government subjects the proposed data center to a special use or conditional use permit or procedure different than the local unit of government requires for ordinary commercial, warehouse, office, research, technology, industrial, utility, or other similar uses. (b) The local unit of government conducts 1 or more public hearings to solicit public input. (c) The local unit of government makes written findings regarding the impact that the proposed data center will have on the local community. (d) The local unit of government complies with any other law applicable to the local approval. Sec. 9. A person shall not avoid the application of this act to a proposed data center by any of the following means: (a) Subdivision of property. (b) Separate ownership entities or special purpose entities. (c) Phased construction. (d) Sequential applications. (e) Separate site plans. (f) Separate utility interconnection requests. (g) Separate leases, contracts, customers, or operators. (h) Separate corporate affiliates, subsidiaries, parent companies, contractors, or developers. (i) Allocation of electric load, building square footage, acreage, infrastructure demand, or operational capacity among multiple entities, parcels, buildings, phases, or applications. (j) Any other arrangement that obscures the actual scale or nature of the proposed data center. Sec. 11. The attorney general or an affected local unit of government may bring an action to enforce this act. In an action brought under this section, the court may do any of the following: (a) Enjoin a violation of this act. (b) Declare void any local approval granted after the effective date of this act for a proposed data center that had not received a classification determination or had been segmented to avoid the application of this act in violation of section 9. (c) Grant other appropriate relief. Sec. 13. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a local unit of government to grant a local approval or to prohibit a local unit of government from granting a local approval in accordance with this act and other applicable law. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6390 (request no. H07753'26 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.